District of Columbia statutes.
4-1226

Repealed

Utility emergency.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-221, § 27, 36 DCR 553
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 601(a), 41 DCR 2096
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 505(o), 42 DCR 3684
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-1026.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 7 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-1201.